Louisiana, session 2026, SB295.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1042.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1042.1. Coverage for medically necessary treatment for persons with an
acquired brain injury
A. Every health coverage plan delivered or issued for delivery in this
state shall provide, to the extent permitted by federal law, coverage for
medically necessary treatment related to or as a result of an acquired brain
injury.
B.(1) The coverage provided pursuant to this Section shall not include
any lifetime limitation or unreasonable annual limitation of the number of days
or sessions of treatment services.
(2) Any limitations on rehabilitation services in an inpatient
rehabilitation facility shall be separate from and shall not be included in any
limitations of post-acute rehabilitation.
(3) Any limitations shall be separately stated by the health coverage plan
issuer.
C. The coverage provided pursuant to this Section shall not be subject
to any greater deductible, coinsurance, copayments, or out-of-pocket limits than
any other similar benefit provided by the health coverage plan.
D. A health coverage plan shall not deny coverage for medically
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 295 ENROLLED
necessary treatment based solely on the location or setting in which the
treatment is provided, if the treatment is provided in a setting that is clinically
appropriate for the level of care necessary and in compliance with applicable
state licensure, certification, registration, or accreditation requirements.
Clinically appropriate settings may include but are not limited to inpatient
hospital or rehabilitation facility settings, outpatient and day treatment settings,
post-acute residential treatment settings, and home- and community-based
settings.
E. For any medically necessary treatment covered pursuant to this
Section, any adverse determination issued in connection with a preauthorization
or utilization review shall be made by a clinical peer reviewer.
F. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations, in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, to establish a process for an
expedited appeal of any adverse determination by a health coverage plan issuer
for medically necessary treatment covered pursuant to this Section.
G. Medically necessary treatment covered pursuant to this Section shall
be provided by individual practitioners and treatment facilities qualified to
provide acute care and post-acute care rehabilitation services to a person with
an acquired brain injury through possession of the appropriate licenses,
accreditation, training, and experience deemed customary and routine in the
trade practice.
H. For the purposes of this Section, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Acquired brain injury" or "ABI" means any injury to the brain
which is not a progressive neurologic disorder, hereditary, congenital, or
degenerative in nature, and which occurs after birth and may be caused by
infectious diseases, metabolic disorders, endocrine disorders, diminished
oxygen, brain tumors, toxins, a disease that affects the blood supply to the brain,
stroke, or a traumatic brain injury.
(2) "Adverse determination" means a determination by a clinical peer
reviewer, upon review based on the clinical information provided, that an
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 295 ENROLLED
admission, extension of stay, or any other covered ABI service is not medically
necessary.
(3) "Clinical peer reviewer" means a healthcare professional who has
experience in the delivery of treatments and services for persons with acquired
brain injuries and possesses a current and valid license, certificate, or
registration to provide these treatments and services or, where no provision for
a license, certificate or registration exists, is credentialed by the national
accrediting body appropriate to the profession.
(4) "Cognitive communication therapy" means treatment for problems
with communication which have an underlying cause in one or more cognitive
deficits rather than a primary language or speech deficit.
(5) "Cognitive rehabilitation therapy" means a process of relearning
cognitive skills essential for daily living through the coordinated specialized,
integrated therapeutic treatments which are provided in dynamic settings
designed for efficient and effective relearning following damage to brain cells
or brain chemistry due to brain injury.
(6) "Community reintegration services" means incremental, guided,
real-world therapeutic training to develop skills essential for an individual to
participate in life including functional daily activities; to safely live
independently; and to participate in the community while avoiding
rehospitalization and long-term support needs.
(7) "Functional rehabilitation therapy" means a structured approach
which emphasizes learning by doing, and focuses relearning a specific task in
a prescribed format, with maximum opportunity for repeated correct practice.
Functional rehabilitation therapy includes compensatory strategies developed
for those skills which are persistently impaired with individuals trained on daily
implementation. To ensure acquisition and use, the focus of functional
rehabilitation therapy is set on relearning those skills essential for safe daily
living in home- and community-based settings.
(8) "Health coverage plan" means any hospital, health, or medical
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 295 ENROLLED
expense insurance policy, hospital or medical service contract, employee welfare
benefit plan, contract, or other agreement with a health maintenance
organization or a preferred provider organization, health and accident
insurance policy, or any other insurance contract of this type in this state,
including a group insurance plan or a self-insurance plan. "Health coverage
plan" does not include a plan providing coverage for excepted benefits as
defined in R.S. 22:1061, limited benefit health insurance plans, short-term
policies that have a term of less than twelve months, Medicare, Medicaid, and
the Office of Group Benefits programs.
(9) "Medically necessary treatment" means healthcare services that are
consistent with generally accepted principles of professional medical practice.
Medically necessary treatment includes but is not limited to cognitive
rehabilitation therapy; cognitive communication therapy; neurocognitive
therapy and rehabilitation; neurobehavioral; neurophysiological; and
neuropsychological testing; neurofeedback therapy; functional rehabilitation
therapy; community reintegration services; post-acute residential treatment
services; inpatient services; outpatient and day treatment services; and home-
and community-based treatment.
(10) "Neurobehavioral therapy" means a set of medical and therapeutic
assessments and treatments focused on behavioral impairments associated with
brain disease or injury and the amelioration of these impairments through the
development of prosocial behavior.
(11) "Neurocognitive therapy" means treatment of disorders in which
the primary clinical deficit is in cognitive function which has not been present
since birth and is a decline from a previously attained level of function.
(12) "Neuropsychological testing" means a set of medical and
therapeutic assessments and treatments focused on amelioration of cognitive,
emotional, psychosocial, and behavioral deficits caused by brain injury.
(13) "Post-acute residential treatment" means integrated medical and
therapeutic services, treatment, education, and skills training provided in a
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 295 ENROLLED
home- and community-based setting and designed to create the maximum
opportunity for correct practice of skill in the context of use to develop new
neural pathways to enable the person to avoid rehospitalization and long-term
care.
I. To the extent that any provision of this Section would otherwise
require this state to make a payment under 42 U.S.C. 18031(d)(3)(B)(ii), a
qualified health plan, as defined by 45 CFR Part 155.20, shall not be required
to provide a benefit under this Section that exceeds the essential health benefits
specified under 42 U.S.C. 18022(b).
Section 2. The provisions of this Act apply to any new policy, contract, program, or
health coverage plan issued on and after January 1, 2027. Any policy, contract, or health
coverage plan in effect prior to January 1, 2027, shall convert to conform to the provisions
of this Act on or before the renewal date, but no later than January 1, 2028.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.